test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cases_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - урэ: # vowel
    урэ+N+Sg+Nom: урэ
    урэ+N+Sg+Acc+Def: урэвэ
    урэ+N+Sg+Acc+Ind: урэе
    урэ+N+Sg+Dat: урэдӯ
    урэ+N+Sg+Loc: урэлэ̄
    урэ+N+Sg+All: урэткӣ
    урэ+N+Sg+Prl: урэлӣ
    урэ+N+Sg+Ter: урэклэ̄
    урэ+N+Sg+Dir: урэклӣ
    урэ+N+Sg+Abl: урэдук
    урэ+N+Sg+Ela: урэгит
    урэ+N+Sg+Ins: урэт
    урэ+N+Sg+Com: урэнун
    урэ+N+Pl+Nom: урэл
    урэ+N+Pl+Acc+Def: урэлвэ
    урэ+N+Pl+Acc+Ind: урэлэ
    урэ+N+Pl+Dat: урэлдӯ
    урэ+N+Pl+Loc: урэлдулэ̄
    урэ+N+Pl+All: урэлтыкӣ
    урэ+N+Pl+Prl: урэлдулӣ
    урэ+N+Pl+Ter: урэликлэ̄
    урэ+N+Pl+Dir: урэликлӣ
    урэ+N+Pl+Abl: урэлдук
    урэ+N+Pl+Ela: урэлгит
    урэ+N+Pl+Ins: урэлди
    урэ+N+Pl+Com: урэлнун


  Noun - бэр: # voiced cns
    бэр+N+Sg+Nom: бэр
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def: бэрвэ
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind: бэръе
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat: бэрдӯ
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc: бэрдулэ̄
    бэр+N+Sg+All: бэртыкӣ
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl: бэрдулӣ
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter: бэриклэ̄
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir: бэриклӣ
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl: бэрдук
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela: бэргит
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins: бэрит
    бэр+N+Sg+Com: бэрнун
    бэр+N+Pl+Nom: бэрил
    бэр+N+Pl+Acc+Def: бэрилвэ
    бэр+N+Pl+Acc+Ind: бэрилэ
    бэр+N+Pl+Dat: бэрилдӯ
    бэр+N+Pl+Loc: бэрилдулэ̄
    бэр+N+Pl+All: бэрилтыкӣ
    бэр+N+Pl+Prl: бэрилдулӣ
    бэр+N+Pl+Ter: бэриликлэ̄
    бэр+N+Pl+Dir: бэриликлӣ
    бэр+N+Pl+Abl: бэрилдук
    бэр+N+Pl+Ela: бэрилгит
    бэр+N+Pl+Ins: бэрилди
    бэр+N+Pl+Com: бэрилнун



  Noun - дэт: # unvoiced cns
    дэт+N+Sg+Nom: дэт
    дэт+N+Sg+Acc+Def: дэтвэ
    дэт+N+Sg+Acc+Ind: дэтъе
    дэт+N+Sg+Dat: дэттӯ
    дэт+N+Sg+Loc: дэттулэ̄
    дэт+N+Sg+All: дэттыкӣ
    дэт+N+Sg+Prl: дэттулӣ
    дэт+N+Sg+Ter: дэтыклэ̄
    дэт+N+Sg+Dir: дэтыклӣ
    дэт+N+Sg+Abl: дэттук
    дэт+N+Sg+Ela: дэткит
    дэт+N+Sg+Ins: дэтыт
    дэт+N+Sg+Com: дэтнун
    дэт+N+Pl+Nom: дэтыл
    дэт+N+Pl+Acc+Def: дэтылвэ
    дэт+N+Pl+Acc+Ind: дэтылэ
    дэт+N+Pl+Dat: дэтылдӯ
    дэт+N+Pl+Loc: дэтылдулэ̄
    дэт+N+Pl+All: дэтылтыкӣ
    дэт+N+Pl+Prl: дэтылдулӣ
    дэт+N+Pl+Ter: дэтыликлэ̄
    дэт+N+Pl+Dir: дэтыликлӣ
    дэт+N+Pl+Abl: дэтылдук
    дэт+N+Pl+Ela: дэтылгит
    дэт+N+Pl+Ins: дэтылди
    дэт+N+Pl+Com: дэтылнун


  Noun - орон: # n
    орон+N+Sg+Nom: орон
    орон+N+Sg+Acc+Def: оронмо
    орон+N+Sg+Acc+Ind: ороно
    орон+N+Sg+Dat: орондӯ
    орон+N+Sg+Loc: орондула̄
    орон+N+Sg+All: оронтыкӣ
    орон+N+Sg+Prl: орондулӣ
    орон+N+Sg+Ter: ороникла̄
    орон+N+Sg+Dir: орониклӣ
    орон+N+Sg+Abl: орондук
    орон+N+Sg+Ela: оронӈит
    орон+N+Sg+Ins: оронди
    орон+N+Sg+Com: ороннун
    орон+N+Pl+Nom: орор
    орон+N+Pl+Acc+Def: орорво
    орон+N+Pl+Acc+Ind: ороро
    орон+N+Pl+Dat: орордӯ
    орон+N+Pl+Loc: орордула̄
    орон+N+Pl+All: орордыкӣ
    орон+N+Pl+Prl: орордулӣ
    орон+N+Pl+Ter: орориклэ̄
    орон+N+Pl+Dir: орориклӣ
    орон+N+Pl+Abl: орордук
    орон+N+Pl+Ela: ороргит
    орон+N+Pl+Ins: орорди
    орон+N+Pl+Com: орорнун


  Noun - дӯннэ: #
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Nom : дӯннэ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Acc+Def: дӯннэвэ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Acc+Ind: дӯннэе
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Dat: дӯннэдӯ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Loc: дӯннэлэ̄
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+All: дӯннэткӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Prl: дӯннэлӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Ter: дӯннэклэ̄
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Dir: дӯннэклӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Abl: дӯннэдук
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Ela: дӯннэгит
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Ins: дӯннэт
    дӯннэ+N+Sg+Com: дӯннэнун
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Nom: дӯннэл
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Acc+Def: дӯннэлвэ
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Acc+Ind: дӯннэлэ # дӯннэлъе
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Dat: дӯннэлдӯ
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Loc: дӯннэлдулэ̄
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+All: дӯннэлтыкӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Prl: дӯннэлдулӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Ter: дӯннэликлэ̄
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Dir: дӯннэликлӣ
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Abl: дӯннэлдук
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Ela: дӯннэлгит
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Ins: дӯннэлди
    дӯннэ+N+Pl+Com: дӯннэлнун
